Hawaii statutes.
[§88-99] Moratorium on benefit enhancements.
There shall be no benefit enhancements under this chapter for any group of
members, including any reduction of retirement age, until such time as the
actuarial value of the system's assets is one hundred per cent of the system's
actuarial accrued liability. [L 2011, c 29, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next